Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 36 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee" means any individual employed by any employer; and
(b) "Employer":
1. Means any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency,
or firm who employs an employee and includes any person, either
individual, corporation, partnership, agency, or firm acting directly or
indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;
and
2. Includes cities, counties, urban-county governments, charter county
governments, unified local governments, consolidated local
governments, and special districts.
(2) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, an employer shall not discriminate
against, discipline, or discharge an employee because:
(a) The employee is a member of the Civil Air Patrol; or
(b) The employee is absent from work when:
1. The absence is for the purpose of responding as a member of the Civil
Air Patrol to:
a. An emergency declared by the Governor or the President of the
United States; or
b. A mission directed from the Air Force Rescue Coordination
Center;
2. The employee gives his or her employer as much notice as possible of
the dates he or she will be absent to serve with the Civil Air Patrol
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/13/2026 8:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 248
during the emergency; and
3. The employee provides his or her employer with verification from the
Civil Air Patrol of the emergency need for his or her volunteer service.
(3) Any employee who is a member of the Civil Air Patrol and was absent under the
conditions set out in subsection (2)(b) of this section, upon his or her return from
emergency Civil Air Patrol service, shall be permitted to return to his or her
former position of employment with the seniority, status, pay, or any other rights
or benefits he or she would have had if he or she had not been absent.
(4) This section shall not prohibit an employer from:
(a) Treating the time the employee is absent because of emergency Civil Air
Patrol service as unpaid time off; and
(b) Complying with a collective bargaining agreement or employee benefit plan
entered into prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 61.394 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) All officers and employees of this state, or of any department or agency
thereof who are members of the National Guard or of any reserve component
of the Armed Forces of the United States, or of the reserve corps of the United
States Public Health Service, shall be entitled to leave of absence from their
respective duties, without loss of time, pay, regular leave, impairment of
efficiency rating, or of any other rights or benefits to which they are entitled,
while:
1.[(a)] In the performance of duty or training in the service of a state or of
the United States under competent orders as specified in this section;
2.[(b)] Physically disabled as a result of an injury, illness, or disease
incurred or aggravated in the line of duty while performing active-duty
or inactive-duty training; or
3.[(c)] Entitled to incapacitation pay pursuant to 37 U.S.C. sec. 204.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/13/2026 8:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 248
Leave pursuant to subparagraphs 2. and 3.[paragraphs (b) and (c)] of this
paragraph[subsection] shall not exceed six (6) months unless approved by the
employee's appointing authority.
(b)[(2)] In any one (1) federal fiscal year, officers or employees, while on
military leave, shall, upon request, be paid their salaries or compensations for
a period or periods not exceeding twenty-one (21) calendar days. Any unused
military leave in a federal fiscal year shall be carried over to the next year.
Any unused military leave shall expire two (2) years after it has accrued.
(2) All officers and employees of this state, or of any department or agency thereof,
who are members of the Civil Air Patrol shall be entitled to leave of absence from
their respective duties without loss of time, pay, regular leave, impairment of
efficiency rating, or of any other rights or benefits to which they are entitled
while responding as a member of the Civil Air Patrol to:
(a) An emergency declared by the Governor or the President of the United
States; or
(b) A mission directed from the Air Force Rescue Coordination Center.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/13/2026 8:27 AM Jacketed